BrailleTables/en-us-g2.ctb
# the letter m
always m 134
always M 134
always many 456-134
begword mc =
always medic 134-1246-24-14 medicare
midendword ment 56-2345
midword menth 134-26-1456 Blumenthal
always mention 134-26-56-1345
always mideast 134-24-145-15-1-34
word milling 134-24-123-123-346
begword mishand 134-24-234-125-12346 mishandled
always mishap =
sufword mishear 134-24-234-125-15-345 misheard
begword missh 134-24-234-146 misshapen
word mistook =
begword mistran = mistranslation
sufword mistreat 134-24-234-2345-1235-2-2345
begword mistru = mistrust
begword misty = mistyped
word monetary 134-5-135-2345-345-13456
word more 134
always mother 5-134
always much 134-16
word mch =
word must 134-34
word mst =
begword musti 134-34-24 mustiness
word mustn 134-34-1345 mustn't
word musty 134-34-13456
begword myo = myofibroblasts
word myself 134-13456-124
contraction myf

# the letter n
always n 1345
always N 1345
always name 5-1345
always nament 1345-1-56-2345 tournament
always namese =
endnum nd = (second)
always necessary 1345-15-14
contraction nec
word neither 1345-15-24
contraction nei
midendword ness 56-234
always nighth 1345-24-126-2345-125 nighthawk knighthood
begword non =
word none 1345-5-135
word nones 1345-5-135-234
word nonesuch 1345-5-135-234-16
word nonetheless 1345-5-135-2346-46-234
word noone 1345-135-5-135
sufword nose = nosedive
word not 1345
word noways =
sufword nowhere 1345-135-5-156
begword nuth 1345-136-2345-125 nuthatch nuthouse

# the letter o
word o 135
always o 135
always O 135
begword oe = Oedipus
midword oed = Schroeder
always oen = Phoenix
largesign of 12356
midendword ofar 135-124-345 insofar
always ofold = twofold
midword ofor 135-123456
always onesi =
midendword oness 135-56-234
midendword oneer 135-1345-15-12456
midendword oned 135-1345-1246
always one 5-135
always aione = zabaione
midendword mione = Hermione
always onent 135-1345-26-2345
midendword oneous 135-1345-15-1256-234 erroneous
always oner 135-1345-12456
midendword onese = Cantonese,
word oneself 5-135-124
word onef =
midendword oness 135-56-234 Deaconess
midendword onet = phonetics bayonet
endword onez = Ordonez
midendword ong 56-1245
midendword ongen 135-1345-1245-26 uncongenial
always oon = sooner
begword orangea = orangeade
word ou =
always ou 1256
midendword ound 46-145
midendword ount 46-2345
always ourselves 1256-1235-1236-234
word ourvs =
word out 1256
always ought 5-1256
always ow 246
word o'clock 135-3-14

# the letter p
always p 1234
always P 1234
always paid 1234-145
contraction pd
begword palingen 1234-1-123-35-1245-26 palingenesis (new birth)
sufword panther 1234-1-1345-2346-1235 pantheresque
always part 5-1234
begword parta 1234-345-2345-1 partake
begword parto 1234-345-2345-135
begword peacen 1234-2-14-15-1345 peacenik
word people 1234
always perceive 1234-12456-14-1236
word percv =
word percvd =
word percvr =
word percvs =
word percvst =
word percvth =
always perceiving 1234-12456-14-1236-1245
word percvg =
always perhaps 1234-12456-125
word perh =
sufword perseverance 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456-46-15
sufword persevere 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456-15
sufword persevered 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456-1246
sufword perseverer 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456-12456
sufword persevering 1234-12456-234-15-1236-12456-346
always pher 1234-125-12456 cyphered
begword pinea 1234-35-15-1 pineapple
word phoneme =
word phonemes =
begword phonemi = phonemic
sufword poleax =
begword portho = porthole
begword potho = pothole pothook
begword pre =
always preach 1234-1235-2-16
sufword predator 1234-1235-1246-1-2345-135-1235
always prof =
begword proff 1234-1235-12356-124 proffer
always profit 1234-1235-12356-24-2345

# the letter q
always q 12345
always Q 12345
always quick 12345-13
contraction qk
word quite 12345
always question 5-12345

# the letter r
always r 1235
always R 1235
sufword rafter 1235-1-124-2345-12456
word rather 1235
begword ratho = rathole
sufword raw = rawhide
endnum rd = (third)
begword reab = reabsorbed
always reach 1235-2-16
always react =
always reaction 1235-15-1-14-56-1345
begword readj = readjust
begword readm = readmit
begword reaff 1235-15-1-235
always reagent 1235-15-1-1245-26-2345
begword reagg 1235-15-1-2356 reaggregated
begword realig = realign
begword rean = reanalyze, reanimate
begword reapp = reappear
begword reasc 1235-15-1-234-14 reascend
begword reass 1235-15-1-234-234
begword reatt = reattach
begword reau = reauthorization
begword reaw = reawaken
begword rede =
begword redi =
word redo =
begword redol 1235-1246-135-123 redolent
word redone 1235-15-145-5-135
begword redou 1235-15-145-1256 redouble redoubt 
always redu = reduce redundant reduplicate
always redul 1235-1246-136-123 incredulous
always receive 1235-14-1236
contraction rcv
contraction rcvd
contraction rcvr
contraction rcvs
word rcvst =
word rcvth =
always receiving 1235-14-1236-1245
contraction rcvg
begword redis = redistribute
begword redr = redress
always rejoice 1235-245-14
contraction rjc
contraction rjcd
contraction rjcr
contraction rjcs
word rjcst =
word rjcth =
always rejoicing 1235-245-14-1245
contraction rjcg
sufword renaming 1235-15-1345-1-134-346 renamings
begword rene = renegotiate
begword renegad 1235-26-15-1245-1-145 renegade
begword renom = renominate
begword renou 1235-15-1345-1256 renounce
sufword renown 1235-15-1345-246-1345 renowned
begword renu = renunciation
begword rer 1235-15-1235 reread
always rever 1235-15-1236-12456
always reveren 1235-5-15-26 irreverent
always reverence 1235-5-15-56-15 irreverence
sufword reverie 1235-5-15-24-15
begword rh = Rhadamanthus
always right 5-1235

# the letter s
endnum s = 40s (no letter sign)
always s 234
always S 234
word said 234-145
contraction sd
sufword salmon = salmonella
sufword saw = sawhorse
sufword screw = screwhole
always seda =
always sedation 234-15-145-6-1345
always sedativ 234-1246-1-2345-24-1236
always sedi =
always sediment 234-1246-24-56-2345
always sedu =
begword sedul 234-1246-136-123 sedulous
sufword sedum 234-1246-136-134
always sent 234-26-2345 sentimental
sufword severe 234-15-1236-12456-15
always severed 234-5-15-1246
always severer 234-5-15-12456
always severit 234-15-1236-12456-24-2345
always severity 234-15-1236-12456-56-13456
begword shaked 146-1-13-15-145 shakedown
word shall 146
word sh =
always sh 146
always shaus = In German names
always should 146-145
word shd =
always shoulder 146-1256-123-145-12456
begword side = sidenote
sufword sided 234-24-145-1246
sufword sider 234-24-145-12456 sidereal siderite
word simone =
word singapore 234-346-1-1234-135-1235-15 
midendword sion 46-1345
midword stak 234-2345-1-13
midendword stion 234-56-1345
word so 234
always some 5-234
midendword somed 234-135-134-1246 ransomed
always somer 234-135-134-12456 somersault 
always someter 234-135-134-15-2345-12456 gasometer 
always somever 234-135-134-5-15
always spirit 456-234
sufword squall = swually
midendword ssword 234-234-45-2456 crossword 
endnum st 34 (first)
word st =
always st 34
always sth 234-1456
always sthe 234-2346
midendword sthead 34-125-2-145 masthead
always sthood 34-125-135-135-145 priesthood
word still 34
always stime 234-5-2345
midendword stown 234-2345-246-1345 Pickstown
begword styro 34-13456-1235-135 styrofoam
always shead 234-125-2-145
always sheart 124-125-15-345-2345
always shouse 234-125-1256-234-15
always ssh =
always shood =
word such 234-16
before consonent sufword such 234-16
word sch =
always sword =

# the letter t
always t 2345
always T 2345
endnum th 1456 (fourth, fifth, ...)
word th =
always th 1456
always thand 2345-125-12346 shorthand
word that 2345
always theap 2345-125-2-1234 antheap
always thill 2345-125-24-123-123 anthill
word this 1456
word thyself 1456-13456-124
word thyf =
always tnam =
joinword to 235
word today 2345-145
contraction td
word tomorrow 2345-134
contraction tm
word tonight 2345-1345
contraction tn
always thead 2345-125-2-145
always theast 1456-15-1-34
always theart 2345-125-15-345-2345
always thouse 2345-125-1256-234-15
lastlargesign the 2346
word themselves 2346-134-1236-234
word themvs 1456-15-134-1236-234
always their 456-2346
always thence 1456-56-15
always there 5-2346
midendword thereal 2346-1235-2-123 ethereal
word thereupon 5-2346-45-136
always thered 2346-1235-1246
always therer 2346-1235-12456
begword theres 2346-1235-15-234 theresa therese 
always thood =
midendword tion 56-1345
always time 5-2345
midendword timed 1245-24-134-1246
midendword timer 2345-24-134-12456
midendword timet = altimeter
word these 45-2346
always through 5-1456
always together 2345-1245-1235
contraction tgr
word those 45-1456
begword trans = transtype

# the letter u
always u 136
always U 136
begword un = unameliorated
begword unb = unblemished
begword undis = undisturbed
begword uneas = unease
begword uneat = uneaten
sufword unful = unfulfilled
word upon 45-136 Dupont
word us 136
always under 5-136
word unsaid 136-1345-234-145

# the letter v
always v 1236
always V 1236
begword vaing 1236-1-35-1245 vainglory
word very 1236
begword vice = viceroy

# the letter w
always w 2456
always W 2456
lowword was 356
word wh =
always wh 156
midendword whart 2456-125-345-2345 Newhart
word which 156
midendword whouse 2456-125-1256-234-15 Newhouse
begword widea = wideawake
word will 2456
lowword were 2356
always where 5-156
word whereupon 5-156-45-136
word wherever 156-12456-5-15
sufword wiseacre =
largesign with 23456
always word 45-2456
word whose 45-156
always work 5-2456
always would 2456-145
contraction wd
always world 456-2456

# the letter x
always x 1346
always X 1346

# the letter y
always y 13456
always Y 13456
word you 13456
always young 5-13456
word your 13456-1235
contraction yr
word yours 13456-1235-234
contraction yrs
word yourself 13456-1235-124
contraction yrf
word yourselves 13456-1235-1236-234
contraction yrvs

# the letter z
always z 1356
always Z 1356

always agosom = phagosome
always ibosom = ribosome
always omosom = chromosome

# Système International Prefixes
begword yotta 13456-135-2345-2345-1 10^24
begword zetta 1356-15-2345-2345-1 10^21
# begword exa 15-1346-1 10^18
begword peta 1234-15-2345-1 10^15
begword tera 2345-12456-1 10^12
begword giga 1245-24-1245-1 10^9
begword mega 134-15-1245-1 10^6
begword kilo 13-24-123-135 10^3
begword hecto 125-15-14-2345-135 10^2
begword deca 145-15-14-1 10^1
begword deci 145-15-14-24 10^-1
begword centi 14-26-2345-24 10^-2
begword milli 134-24-123-123-24 10^-3
begword micro 134-24-14-1235-135 10^-6
begword nano 1345-1-1345-135 10^-9
begword pico 1234-24-14-135 10^-12
begword femto 124-15-134-2345-135 10^-15
begword atto 1-2345-2345-135 10^-18
begword zepto 1356-15-1234-2345-135 10^-21
begword yocto 13456-135-14-2345-135 10^-24

begword ante =
begword anti =
begword endo 26-145-135
begword epi =
begword extra =
begword hyper 125-13456-1234-12456
begword hypo =
begword infra 35-124-1235-1
begword inter 35-2345-12456
begword intra 35-2345-1235-1
begword iso =
begword macro =
begword meta =
begword micro =
begword mono =
begword multi =
begword patho 1234-1-1456-135
begword peri 1234-12456-24
begword poly =
begword post 1234-135-34
begword pre =
begword pseudo =
begword retro =
# begword semi = seminar
begword sub =
begword super 234-136-1234-12456
begword tetra =
begword trans =
begword ultra =
# begword uni =

# other prefixes
begword electro =
begword gastro 1245-1-34-1235-135
begword neuro =
begword psycho 1234-234-13456-16-135

prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always " 5

postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 3-356
always ' 3
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
word 'twill =
endword 'd 3-145
endword 'll 3-123-123
endword 'm 3-134
endword 're 3-1235-15
endword 's 3-234
endword 't 3-2345
endword 've 3-1236-15

prepunc `` 236
always ` 4

midnum ^ 45
always ^ 456-126

always ~ 4-156
repeatable ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156

midnum , 2
always , 2

always ; 23

midnum : 25
always : 25
repeatable ::: 25-25-25

midnum . 46
always . 256
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .

endnum ! 12346 (factorial)
always ! 235

always ? 236

always ( 2356
always ) 2356
